Mississippi statutes. Title 87. Contracts and Contractual Relations
Chapter 1. Gambling and Future Contracts

§ 87-1-1.
Utterly void.

Contracts, judgments, securities, conveyances made, given, granted, or executed, where the whole or any part of the consideration or foundation thereof shall be for money, or any valuable thing won, lost, or bet at any game or games, or on any horse-race, cock-fight, or at any other sport, amusement, or pastime, or on any wager whatever, or for the reimbursing or repaying any money knowingly lent or advanced for the purpose of such gaming or gambling, or to be wagered on any game, play, horse-race, cock-fight, or on any sport, amusement, pastime, or wager, shall be utterly void.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 64, art. 3 (1); 1857, ch. 45, art. 1; 1871, § 1900; 1880, § 990; 1892, § 2114; 1906, § 2300; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1910; 1930, § 1824; 1942, § 22.

§ 87-1-3.
Transfer of property to secure or pay, inures to wife and children of loser.

Any sale, mortgage, transfer, or conveyance of any estate, real or personal, to any person or to another for his use or benefit, or in any manner to satisfy or secure money or other thing won, or any part thereof, or to secure or satisfy any money or other thing lent or advanced on any consideration, foundation, or purpose mentioned in Section 87-1-1, or any part thereof, shall inure to and vest in the wife and children of said mortgagor, seller, vendor, bargainor, or lessor, the whole estate, title, and interest of such person sold, mortgaged, bargained, transferred, or conveyed, as though such person had died intestate. And the parties to any action founded on any contract or transaction within this chapter, shall be compelled to answer any bill of discovery touching the same.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 64, art. 3 (2); 1857, ch. 45, art. 2; 1871, § 1901; 1880, § 991; 1892, § 2115; 1906, § 2301; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1911; 1930, § 1825; 1942, § 23.

§ 87-1-5.
Loser may sue and recover money or property lost; exceptions.

If any person, by playing at any game whatever, or by betting on the sides or hands of such as do play at any game, or by betting on any horse race or cockfight, or at any other sport or pastime, or by any wager whatever, shall lose any money, property, or other valuable thing, real or personal, and shall pay or deliver the same or any part thereof, the person so losing and paying or delivering the same, or his wife or children, may sue for and recover such money, property, or other valuable thing so lost and paid or delivered, or any part thereof, from the person knowingly receiving the same, with costs. However, this section shall not apply to betting, gaming or wagering:

On a cruise vessel as defined in Section 27-109-1 whenever such vessel is in the waters within the State of Mississippi, which lie adjacent to the State of Mississippi south of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi, including the Mississippi Sound, St. Louis Bay, Biloxi Bay and Pascagoula Bay;

In a structure located in whole or in part on shore in any of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi in which the registered voters of the county have voted to allow such betting, gaming or wagering on cruise vessels as provided in Section 19-3-79, if:

The structure is owned, leased or controlled by a person possessing a gaming license, as defined in Section 75-76-5, to conduct legal gaming on a cruise vessel under paragraph (a) of this section;

The part of the structure in which licensed gaming activities are conducted is located entirely in an area which is located no more than eight hundred (800) feet from the mean high-water line (as defined in Section 29-15-1) of the waters within the State of Mississippi, which lie adjacent to the State of Mississippi south of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi, including the Mississippi Sound, St. Louis Bay, Biloxi Bay and Pascagoula Bay, or, with regard to Harrison County only, no farther north than the southern boundary of the right-of-way for U.S. Highway 90, whichever is greater; and

In the case of a structure that is located in whole or part on shore, the part of the structure in which licensed gaming activities are conducted shall lie adjacent to state waters south of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi, including the Mississippi Sound, St. Louis Bay, Biloxi Bay and Pascagoula Bay. When the site upon which the structure is located consists of a parcel of real property, easements and rights-of-way for public streets and highways shall not be construed to interrupt the contiguous nature of the parcel, nor shall the footage contained within the easements and rights-of-way be counted in the calculation of the distances specified in subparagraph (ii).

On a vessel as defined in Section 27-109-1 whenever such vessel is on the Mississippi River or navigable waters within any county bordering on the Mississippi River; or

That is legal under the laws of the State of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 64, art. 3 (3); 1857, ch. 45, art. 3; 1871, § 1902; 1880, § 992; 1892, § 2116; 1906, § 2302; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1912; 1930, § 1826; 1942, § 24; Laws, 1989, ch. 481, § 1; Laws, 1990, ch. 449, § 3; Laws, 1990, ch. 573, § 7; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 45 § 147; Laws, 2005, 5th Ex Sess, ch. 16, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Oct. 17, 2005.).

§ 87-1-7.
Limitation on application of Sections 87-1-1 through 87-1-5.

Sections 87-1-1, 87-1-3 and 87-1-5 shall not apply to contracts for future delivery which are valid under succeeding sections of this chapter and shall not apply to activity which is lawfully conducted pursuant to the regulatory authority of the Mississippi Gaming Control Act (Section 75-76-1 et seq.)

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 64, art. 3 (3); 1857, ch. 45, art. 3; 1871, § 1902; 1880, § 992; 1892, § 2116; 1906, § 2302; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1912; 1930, § 1826; 1942, § 24; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 45, § 84, eff from and after passage (approved June 29, 1990).

§ 87-1-9.
Future contracts; definitions.

For the purposes of the following sections of this chapter the term “contract” shall be held to include sales, purchases, agreements of sale, agreements to sell and agreements to purchase, that the word “person” wherever used in the following sections shall be construed to import the plural or singular, as the case demands, and shall include individuals, associations, partnerships and corporations.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 1827; 1942, § 25; Laws, 1928, ch. 304.

§ 87-1-11.
Certain exchanges authorized.

There may be organized in any city in the State of Mississippi voluntary associations to be known as cotton exchanges, grain exchanges, boards of trade or similar institutions to receive and post quotations on cotton, grain, stocks, bonds and other commodities for the benefit of its members and other persons engaged in the production of cotton, grain and other commodities. Such associations shall adopt a uniform set of rules and regulations not incompatible with the laws, as are usual for such associations. They shall open their books to the inspection of proper courts and officers of the law when required.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 1834; 1942, § 32; Laws, 1928, ch. 304.

§ 87-1-13.
Who may provide market quotations by wire.

Only members of cotton exchanges, grain exchanges, boards of trade or similar institutions organized under the laws of Mississippi or any other state may provide for their use and the use of their clients, private or public wires from cities in Mississippi where such cotton exchanges, grain exchanges, boards of trade or similar institutions are located to other cities without the State of Mississippi where cotton exchanges, grain exchanges, boards of trade or similar institutions are operated, and may receive over such private or public wires and post for their own use and that of their clients and of any person engaged in the production of cotton, grain or other commodities, market quotations and market news, covering cotton, grain, stocks and other commodities, and transmit for execution contracts of sale for future delivery. In all cases it is contemplated that the delivery of the commodity purchased or sold, as the case may be, will be carried out by the principals or their successors or assignees; and that the contract for delivery thereof will be performed or discharged according to the rules of the exchange, board of trade or similar institutions where the contract is executed.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 1835; 1942, § 33; Laws, 1928, ch. 304.

§ 87-1-15.
When contracts of sale for future delivery of cotton, grain, stock, or other commodities enforceable.

All contracts of sale for future delivery of cotton, grain, stock, or other commodities (a) made in accordance with the rules of any board of trade, exchange or similar institution where such contracts of sale are executed; and (b) actually executed on the floor of such board of trade, exchange or similar institutions and performed or discharged according to the rules thereof; and (c) when such contracts of sale are made with or through a regular member in good standing of a cotton exchange, grain exchange or similar institution organized under the laws of the State of Mississippi or any other state shall be, and they are hereby declared to be, valid and enforceable in the courts of this state according to their terms.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (1) of this section, contracts of sale for the future delivery of cotton in order to be valid and enforceable must not only conform to the requirements of clauses (a), (b) and (c) of subsection (1) of this section, but must also be made subject to the provisions of the United States Internal Revenue Code of 1954, subchapter D. In the event, however, that this subsection be held inoperative for any reason, then contracts for the future delivery of cotton shall be valid and enforceable if they conform to the requirements of clauses (a), (b) and (c) of subsection (1) of this section.

If contracts of sale for future delivery of cotton, grain, stock, or other commodity shall conform to all of the requirements set forth above in this section, then the same shall be valid and enforceable in all the courts of this state, notwithstanding that at the time of execution of such contracts that either or both of the parties thereto did not contemplate or intend that the same should be consummated by the actual delivery and receipt of the commodity specified. The plain intent of this section, while declaring unlawful all transactions conducted in and through a “bucket shop” as hereinafter defined, is to make lawful and enforceable and to withdraw from the provisions of the gaming and wagering laws, all transactions executed upon and in accordance with the rules of a legitimate cotton, grain, stock or other commodity exchange or board of trade whether the intent of delivery of the actual commodity was present or not and this section shall be liberally construed at all times so as to effectuate this purpose.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 1828; 1942, § 26; Laws, 1928, ch. 304; Laws, 1956, ch. 229.

§ 87-1-17.
Brokers may recover certain advances.

Any broker, agent or any other person making advances to or for account of any party to any contract falling within and satisfying the provisions of Section 87-1-15 shall be entitled to recover the amount of such advances from the party to, or for account of whom, the advances were made.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 1829; 1942, § 27; Laws, 1928, ch. 304.

§ 87-1-19.
When contracts of sale for future delivery of cotton, grain, stocks, or other commodities unenforceable.

Any contract of sale for the future delivery of cotton, grain, stocks, or other commodities, which is to be settled according to or upon the basis of the public market quotations or prices made on any board of trade, exchange or similar institutions, upon which contracts of sale for future delivery are executed and dealt in without any actual bona fide execution and the carrying out or discharge of such contracts upon the floor of such exchange, board of trade or similar institution, in accordance with the rules thereof, shall be null and void and unenforceable in any court of this state, and no action shall lie thereon at the suit of any party thereto.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 1830; 1942, § 28; Laws, 1928, ch. 304.

§ 87-1-21.
“Bucket shop” defined.

A “bucket shop” is hereby defined to be and mean any place of business wherein are made contracts of the sort or character denounced by Section 87-1-19, and the maintenance or operation of a bucket shop at any point in this state is hereby prohibited.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 1831; 1942, § 29; Laws, 1928, ch. 304.

§ 87-1-23.
Penalties.

Any person either as agent or principal, who knowingly enters into or assists in making any contracts of sale of the sort or character denounced by Section 87-1-19 for the future delivery of cotton, grain, stocks or other commodities, or who maintains or operates a bucket shop as that term is defined in Section 87-1-21, shall be guilty of a felony, and upon conviction thereof shall be fined in a sum not to exceed One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00), or be imprisoned in the penitentiary not exceeding two (2) years, and any person who shall be guilty of a second offense under this chapter, in addition to the penalties above described, may upon conviction, be both fined and imprisoned in the discretion of the court, and if a corporation, it shall be liable to forfeiture of all its rights and privileges as such, and the continuance of such establishment after the first conviction shall be deemed a second offense. It shall be the duty of the attorney general to institute proceedings for the forfeiture of the charter of any corporation making itself liable to such forfeiture under the provisions of this chapter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 1833; 1942, § 31; Laws, 1928, ch. 304.

§ 87-1-25.
Unlawful to rent or lease premises to be used for conducting business prohibited by this chapter.

Any person, whether as agent or owner, who shall rent or lease any office or place of business to any person, association of persons or corporation, to be used in, or for the purpose of negotiating or effectuating the class of contracts prohibited by this chapter, knowing such person, association of persons or corporation to be engaged in such business, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and on conviction shall be punished as provided by law.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 1923; 1930, § 1836; 1942, § 34; Laws, 1908, ch. 118.

§ 87-1-27.
Gambling and future contracts; witnesses denied privilege against self incrimination.

No person shall be excused in any prosecution under Sections 87-1-1 through 87-1-25, concerning gambling and future contracts, from testifying touching anything done by himself or others, contrary to the provisions of said sections; but any discovery made by a witness upon such examination shall not be used against him in any penal or criminal prosecution, and he shall be altogether pardoned of the offense so done or participated in by him.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 1917; 1930, § 1837; 1942, § 35; Laws, 1908, ch. 118.

§ 87-1-29.
Principal entitled to certain written information.

Every person shall furnish upon demand to any principal for whom such person has executed any contract of sale for the future delivery of any cotton, grain, stocks or other commodities a written instrument setting forth the name and location of the exchange, board of trade or similar institution upon which such contract has been executed, the date of execution of the contract and the name and address of the persons with whom such contract was executed and if such person shall refuse or neglect to furnish such statement upon reasonable demand, such refusal or neglect shall be prima facie evidence that such contract was an illegal contract within the provisions of Section 87-1-19, and that the person who executed it was engaged in the maintenance and operation of a “bucket shop” within the provisions of Section 87-1-21.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, §§ 1830, 1832; 1942, § 30; Laws, 1928, ch. 304.

§ 87-1-31.
Prohibition against buying or selling futures.

If any person shall buy or sell commodities of any kind, to be delivered at a future day, without agreeing and intending that the commodities are to be actually delivered in kind, and the price paid, he shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and, on conviction, shall be punished as prescribed in section 87-1-33.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 1121; 1906, § 1202; Hemingway’s 1917, § 932; 1930, § 959; 1942, § 2189.

§ 87-1-33.
Penalty for dealing in futures.

If any person shall deal in contracts called “futures,” or shall, by himself or his agent, directly or indirectly buy or sell any “future” contract, he shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and, on conviction, shall be fined not less than Fifty Dollars ($50.00) nor more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), and be imprisoned in the county jail not more than three (3) months.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 1120; 1906, § 1201; Hemingway’s 1917, § 931; 1930, § 958; 1942, § 2188; Laws, 1882, p. 140.